Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 108
DIRECTORS AND OFFICERS

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see §§ 7-90-102 and 7-101-401.

Law reviews:

For article, "

C

ommercial and

C

orporate Law", which discusses a Tenth Circuit decision dealing with parent company liability for breaching subsidiary-employee contract, see 65 Den. U.L. Rev. 492 (1988); for article, "Risk and Risk Takers: Protecting Corporate Executives With D&O Insurance Policies", see 43 Colo. Law. 39 (Nov. 2014).

Section

PART 1 BOARD OF DIRECTORS

PART 2 MEETINGS AND ACTION OF THE DIRECTORS

PART 3 OFFICERS

PART 4 STANDARDS OF CONDUCT

PART 5 DIRECTOR - CONFLICTS OF INTEREST